Hawaii statutes.
§449-5 License required to act as escrow
depository. (a) No person shall act as an escrow depository in this State
unless it is a corporation licensed to do so by the commissioner.

No person subject to the provisions of this
chapter not licensed or exempted under this chapter shall transact any business
under any name, title or descriptive term which contains the words
"escrow", "escrow depository", or any other word or phrase
having the same or similar meaning.

(b) No person shall act as an escrow depository
from an out-of-state location for property located in this State unless
licensed to act as a Hawaii escrow depository by the commissioner. [L 1967, c
144, pt of §1; HRS §449-5; am L 1969, c 39, §1; am L 1985, c 269, §50; am L
2010, c 49, §1]

Cross References

Title insurers or insurers, see §431:20-106.5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next